Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
243

FUEL TAX
LAW

Section

243-1 Definitions

243-2 Distributors to register and be licensed

243-3 Retail dealers, permits; certificates

243-3.5 Environmental response, energy, and food
security

tax; uses

243-4 License taxes

243-5 County fuel tax

243-6 Fuel taxes, dispositions

243-7 Tax not applicable, when

243-8 License taxes payable monthly

243-9 Distributors, etc., to keep records

243-10 Statements and payments

243-11 Failure to make and file statements and
making false

statement unlawful

243-12 Procedure upon failure to file statement;
penalties

243-13 Director empowered to make examinations,
penalty, etc.

243-14 Assessments; limitation period;
exceptions; extension

by agreement

243-14.5 Appeals

243-15 Repealed

243-16 Rules and regulations

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next